Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-795
Mental health conditions; rules and regulations.

The Director of Insurance may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 44-791 to 44-795.

Laws 1999, LB 355, § 5.